District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1807.56

Preservation of school-based staff positions.

Repealed.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [271], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2756
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4022(a), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.76.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4022(a) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).